Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

29-5-101. Peace officers appointment.

A person shall not assume or exercise the functions, powers, duties, or privileges incident and belonging to a marshal, police officer, or other peace officer without having first received an appointment in writing from the lawfully constituted authorities of the state.

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 20, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 4675.

C.L.

§ 7954.

CSA:

C. 116, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 99-2-1.

L. 64:

p. 296, § 243.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 99-2-1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 245, § 2, effective March 31.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1371), ch. 250, p. 1836, § 1, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the description of peace officer in the criminal code, see § 16-2.5-101.

29-5-102. Impersonating an officer - penalty. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 1891:

p. 21, § 3.

R.S. 08:

§ 4677.

C.L.

§ 7956.

L. 29:

p. 306, § 1.

CSA:

C. 116, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 99-2-3.

L. 63:

p. 339, § 55.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 99-2-3.

L. 64:

p. 297, § 245.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 1081, § 3, effective July 1.

29-5-103. Assignment of police officers or deputy sheriffs for temporary duty.

The chief of police or person performing the functions thereof of any town, city, or city and county or of any state institution of higher education employing peace officers in accordance with article 7.5 of title 24, C.R.S., or the sheriff of any county may in his or her discretion, upon request of the chief of police or person exercising the functions thereof in any other town, city, or city and county or any other state institution of higher education employing a peace officer in accordance with article 7.5 of title 24, C.R.S., or the sheriff of any other county, assign police officers or deputies under his or her control, together with any equipment he or she deems proper, to perform temporary duty within the jurisdiction of the requesting chief of police or sheriff and under the direction and command of the requesting chief of police or sheriff; but the chief of police or sheriff assigning the officers or deputies may provide that the officers or deputies shall be under the immediate command of a superior officer designated by the assigning chief of police or sheriff, which superior officer shall be under the direct supervision and command of the requesting chief of police or sheriff. Nothing contained in this section or sections 29-5-104 to 29-5-110 shall be construed to limit the power of any town, city, city and county, or state institution of higher education employing peace officers in accordance with article 7.5 of title 24, C.R.S., to prohibit or limit by ordinance the exercise by a chief of police or sheriff of the discretion granted in sections 29-5-103 to 29-5-110.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 729, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 99-2-4.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 89, § 13, effective March 18.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-097), ch. 110, p. 457, § 6, effective August 5.

29-5-104. Request for temporary assignment of police officers or deputy sheriffs - authority.

The chief of police, or person performing the functions thereof, of any town, city, or city and county or of a state institution of higher education employing a peace officer in accordance with article 7.5 of title 24, C.R.S., and the sheriff of any county may, when in his or her opinion the same is required to quell disturbances or riots or in any other situation wherein he or she deems that an emergency exists within his or her jurisdiction, request the chief of police or person performing the function thereof of any other city, town, or city and county or at another state institution of higher education employing peace officers in accordance with article 7.5 of title 24, C.R.S., or the sheriff of any other county to assign officers or deputy sheriffs under their respective commands to perform temporary duty within the jurisdiction of the requesting chief of police or sheriff and under the direction and control of the requesting chief of police or sheriff under the terms and conditions as shall be agreed upon between the requesting and assigning chiefs of police or sheriffs. The officers or deputy sheriffs shall, while so assigned and performing duties subject to the direction and control of the requesting chief of police or sheriff, have the same power within the jurisdiction of the requesting chief of police or sheriff as do regular officers or deputies, as the case may be, of the requesting chief of police or sheriff.

Where, under the provisions of section 29-1-206 (1), a county, municipality, or state institution of higher education, in this state enters into an intergovernmental agreement for reciprocal law enforcement with a bordering county or with a municipality within a bordering county that is located in another state, the law enforcement agency head of either county or municipality or of the state institution of higher education may, pursuant to the provisions of the intergovernmental agreement, request the law enforcement agency head of the other county or municipality or state institution of higher education to assign deputy sheriffs or other peace officers to perform law enforcement duties within the jurisdiction of the requesting law enforcement agency head and under the terms and conditions as are stated in the intergovernmental agreement. Prior to an assignment, the deputy sheriffs or other peace officers shall obtain recognition as peace officers in this state as provided for in section 29-1-206 (1). The deputy sheriffs or other peace officers shall, while so assigned and performing duties subject to the direction and control of the requesting law enforcement agency head, have the same power within the jurisdiction of the requesting law enforcement agency head as do regular deputies or other peace officers of the requesting law enforcement agency head.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 730, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 99-2-5.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 246, § 3, effective March 31.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 1574, § 8, effective June 3.

L. 2000:

(2) amended, p. 44, § 5, effective March 10.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 90, § 14, effective March 18; (2) amended and (3) added, p. 699, § 2, effective May 1.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-097), ch. 110, p. 457, § 7, effective August 5.

29-5-105. Assignment of emergency response personnel for temporary duty - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Emergency responder" means a county improvement district providing fire protection services or any other county department or agency that provides fire or emergency medical services, municipal fire departments, fire protection districts, metropolitan districts providing fire protection services, fire authorities, hazardous materials authorities, volunteer fire departments recognized under the "Volunteer Fire Department Organization Act", section 24-33.5-1208.5, and any ambulance service operated by a subdivision of state government.

"Emergency responder personnel" means paid or volunteer personnel of an emergency responder.

The chief or executive officer of an emergency responder may, in his or her discretion and upon a request made by the chief or executive officer of any other emergency responder, assign such personnel and equipment as he or she determines to be proper, to perform temporary emergency services duties under the direction and control of the requesting emergency responder; except that the assigning fire chief or executive officer may require that such emergency responder personnel and equipment shall be under the immediate direction and control of a superior officer of the assigning emergency responder, which superior officer shall be, during such temporary assignment, under the direction and control of the requesting fire chief or executive officer. Nothing contained in this section and sections 29-5-107 to 29-5-110 limits the power of the governing body of any emergency responder to prohibit or limit by ordinance or regulation the exercise by a fire chief or executive officer of the discretion granted in this section and sections 29-5-107 to 29-5-110.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 730, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 99-2-6.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1025, § 50, effective August 6.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-166), ch. 287, p. 1696, § 1, effective June 22.

29-5-106. Temporary assignment to labor dispute area.

Police or sheriffs' officers may be assigned to any duties provided for in sections 29-5-103 and 29-5-104 in an area where there is a labor dispute so long as the situation or incident for which such temporary assignment has been requested is not directly the result of a labor dispute and does not involve those individuals participating in the labor dispute. In a case where the temporary assignment of police or sheriffs' officers is deemed necessary as the direct result of a labor dispute, such temporary assignment may be made only after authorization by the governor or his designee.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 730, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 99-2-7.

L. 89:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1267, § 1, effective April 23.

29-5-107. Request for temporary assignment of emergency response personnel - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Emergency incident" means a natural or manmade emergency incident that overwhelms or has the potential to overwhelm local resources, which incidents include, without limitation, wildland fires, fires occurring in wildland-urban interface areas, structural fires, tornadoes, floods, explosions, weapons of mass destruction, mass casualty, hazardous materials incidents, technical rescue and extrication, emergency medical transport, and emergency medical services.

"Emergency responder" has the same meaning as specified in section 29-5-105 (1).

"Emergency responder personnel" has the same meaning as specified in section 29-5-105 (1).

The chief or executive officer of an emergency responder may, when in his or her opinion the same is required by an emergency incident, request the chief or executive officer of another emergency responder to assign to him or her emergency responder personnel and equipment to perform temporary duty within the boundaries of such requesting emergency responder under the direction and control of such requesting fire chief or executive officer and under such terms and conditions as shall be agreed upon between the requesting and assigning fire chiefs or executive officers. Such emergency responder personnel shall, while so assigned and performing duties subject to the direction and control of the requesting fire chief or executive officer, have the same power as the emergency responder personnel of the requesting emergency responder.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 730, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 99-2-8.

L: 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1025, § 51, effective August 6.

L: 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-166), ch. 287, p. 1697, § 2, effective June 22.

29-5-108. Liability of requesting jurisdiction.

During the time that a police officer or deputy sheriff, as applicable, of a town, city, city and county, county, or of a state institution of higher education employing a peace officer in accordance with article 7.5 of title 24 is assigned to temporary duty within the jurisdiction of another town, city, city and county, county, or of another state institution of higher education employing a peace officer in accordance with article 7.5 of title 24, as provided in sections 29-5-103, 29-5-104, and 29-5-106, any liability that accrues under the provisions of article 10 of title 24, on account of the negligent or otherwise tortious act of the police officer or deputy sheriff while performing the duty is imposed upon the requesting town, city, city and county, county, or state institution of higher education, and not upon the assigning jurisdiction.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2021.)

Source:

L. 63:

p. 731, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 99-2-9.

L. 71:

p. 1215, § 11.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1025, § 52, effective August 6.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 91, § 15, effective March 18.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-097), ch. 110, p. 458, § 8, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-063), ch. 51, p. 120, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-166), ch. 287, p. 1698, § 3, effective June 22.

29-5-109. Workers' compensation coverage.

The coverage of any police officer, deputy sheriff, or firefighter of any town, city, city and county, county, or fire protection district or of any state institution of higher education employing peace officers in accordance with article 7.5 of title 24, C.R.S., under the "Workers' Compensation Act of Colorado", articles 40 to 47 of title 8, C.R.S., shall not be affected by reason of the performance of temporary duties in a requesting town, city, city and county, county, fire protection district, or state institution of higher education under the provisions of sections 29-5-103 to 29-5-107, and the police officers, deputy sheriffs, and firefighters shall remain covered by the workers' compensation insurance while performing the temporary duty as fully as if they were performing their regular duties within the assigning jurisdiction.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 731, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 99-2-10.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 571, § 61, effective July 1.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1026, § 53, effective August 6.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 91, § 16, effective March 18.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-097), ch. 110, p. 458, § 9, effective August 5.

29-5-110. Pension fund payments.

If any police officer, deputy sheriff, or firefighter of any town, city, city and county, county, or fire protection district or of any state institution of higher education employing peace officers in accordance with article 7.5 of title 24, C.R.S., should become disabled or be killed by reason of the performance of temporary duty within the jurisdiction of another town, city, city and county, county, fire protection district, or state institution of higher education, as provided in sections 29-5-103 to 29-5-107, and the disability would entitle him or her or his or her death would entitle his or her survivor to payment from any police or firefighters' or employee pension fund of the town, city, city and county, county, fire protection district, or state institution of higher education assigning him or her to temporary duty in another jurisdiction, had the injury occurred during the performance of his or her duties within the assigning town, city, city and county, county, fire protection district, or state institution of higher education, the police officer, deputy sheriff, or firefighter, or his or her survivor, shall be entitled to the same payment from the pension fund of the assigning town, city, city and county, county, fire protection district, or state institution of higher education, as he or she would have been entitled to receive if the injury or death had occurred within the assigning town, city, city and county, county, fire protection district, or state institution of higher education, and he or she shall not be entitled to receive a payment from any police or firefighters' or employee pension fund of the jurisdiction in which he or she performed the temporary duties.

Source:

L. 63:

p. 731, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 99-2-11.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1026, § 54, effective August 6.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 91, § 17, effective March 18.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-097), ch. 110, p. 459, § 10, effective August 5.

29-5-111. Liability of peace officers.

Notwithstanding the doctrines of sovereign immunity and respondeat superior, a city, town, county, or city and county or other political subdivision of the state or a state institution of higher education employing peace officers in accordance with article 7.5 of title 24, C.R.S., shall indemnify its paid peace officers and reserve officers, as defined in section 16-2.5-110, C.R.S., while the peace officers and reserve officers are on duty for any liability incurred by them and for any judgment, except a judgment for exemplary damages, entered against them for torts committed within the scope of their employment if the person claiming damages serves the political subdivision or state institution of higher education with a copy of the summons within ten days from the date when a copy of the summons is served on the peace officer or reserve officer. In no event shall any political subdivision or state institution of higher education be required so to indemnify its peace officers in excess of one hundred thousand dollars for one person in any single occurrence or three hundred thousand dollars for two or more persons for any single occurrence; except that in such instance no indemnity shall be allowed for any person in excess of one hundred thousand dollars. It is the duty of the city, town, county, city and county, or other political subdivision and of the state institution of higher education to provide the defense handled by the legal staff of the public entity or by other counsel, in the discretion of the public entity, for the peace officer in the claim or civil action. However, in the event that the court determines that a reserve officer, as defined in section 16-2.5-110, C.R.S., incurred the liability while acting outside the scope of his or her assigned duties or that the reserve officer acted in a willful and wanton manner in incurring the liability, the court shall order the reserve officer to reimburse the political subdivision or the state institution of higher education for reasonable costs and reasonable attorney fees expended for the defense of the reserve officer. With the approval of the governing body of the city, town, county, city and county, or other political subdivision or of the state institution of higher education, the claim or civil action may be settled or compromised. A city, town, county, city and county, or other political subdivision or a state institution of higher education may carry liability insurance to insure itself and its peace officers. If the political subdivision or state institution of higher education purchases insurance that provides substantial coverage for the peace officers with a policy limitation of at least one hundred thousand dollars for one person in any single occurrence and three hundred thousand dollars for two or more persons for any single occurrence, except that in such instance no indemnity shall be allowed for any person in excess of one hundred thousand dollars, then the political subdivision or state institution of higher education shall be liable under this section to indemnify the peace officers only to the extent of the limits and for such torts as are covered by the policy and only to the extent of the coverage of the policy. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to condone the conduct of any peace officer who uses excessive force or who violates the statutory or constitutional rights of any person.

This section shall apply only with respect to causes of action accruing on or after July 1, 1972.

Source:

L. 71:

pp. 1048, 1049, §§ 1, 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 99-2-12.

L. 72:

p. 612, § 135.

L. 88:

(1) amended, p. 723, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 1618, § 26, effective August 6.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 92, § 18, effective March 18.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-097), ch. 110, p. 459, § 11, effective August 5.

29-5-112. Dog interactions with local law enforcement officers - training to be provided by local law enforcement agencies - policies and procedures - scope - task force - creation - composition - immunity - short title - legislative declaration - definitions.

Short title. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Dog Protection Act".

Legislative declaration. The general assembly finds, determines, and declares that it is the policy of this state to prevent, whenever possible, the shooting of dogs by local law enforcement officers in the course of performing their official duties. It is therefore the intent of the general assembly to:

Require training for officers of local law enforcement agencies on differentiating between canine behaviors that indicate imminent danger of attack to persons and benign behaviors commonly exhibited by dogs, such as barking, that do not suggest or pose imminent danger of attack;

Require local law enforcement agencies in the state to adopt policies and procedures for use of lethal and nonlethal force against dogs, which policies and procedures must:

Emphasize alternative methods that may be employed when dogs are encountered; and

Allow a dog owner or animal control officer, whenever the owner or an animal control officer is present and it is feasible, the opportunity to control or remove a dog from the immediate area in order to permit a local law enforcement officer to discharge his or her duties;

Recognize the important work of the dog protection task force in developing the training and incorporating the specifics of the training into the statutes. The seventeen members appointed to the task force represented a victim of a dog shooting, veterinarians, animal welfare advocates, animal behaviorists, animal control officers, the sheriffs, the police, and legal professionals. The training includes instruction regarding a dog's body language and how to interpret it, scene assessment, tools to use in dog encounters, situations involving multiple dogs, how to interact with a dog, and responses to dog behavior. The dog encounters training required by this section was designed to protect law enforcement officers, animal control officers, dog owners, innocent bystanders, and the dog. The training is not intended to provide dangerous dog training. Most importantly, the training was designed to limit, as much as feasible, the instances in which an officer would need to use deadly force against a dog, since the possibility of collateral damage, injury, or death from stray rounds is ever-present when a law enforcement officer uses deadly force.

Definitions. As used in this section:

"Dog" means any canine animal owned for domestic, companionship, service, therapeutic, assistance, sporting, working, ranching, or shepherding purposes.

"Dog owner" means a person owning, possessing, harboring, keeping, having guardianship of, having financial or property interest in, or having control or custody of, a dog.

"Licensed veterinarian" means a person who is licensed pursuant to article 315 of title 12 to practice veterinary medicine in this state.

"Local law enforcement agency" means a municipal police department or a county sheriff's office.

"Local law enforcement officer" means any officer in a local law enforcement agency. The term does not include an animal control officer, code enforcement officer, or a deputy sheriff who is assigned exclusively to work in jails, court security, or administration.

Training required.

Each local law enforcement agency is required to provide to its officers training pertaining to encounters with dogs in the course of duty. At a minimum, the training must cover the policies and procedures adopted by the agency pursuant to subsection (6) of this section and assist officers in assessing what dog posture, barking and other vocalizations, and facial expressions typically signify, the options for distracting and escaping from a dog, options for safely capturing a dog, and defensive options in dealing with a dog.

Each local law enforcement agency in the state shall:

Develop, by September 1, 2014, a training program consistent with the requirements of this section and the minimum training curricula developed by the dog protection task force pursuant to subsection (5) of this section;

Require its current local law enforcement officers to complete the training program required by this subsection (4) by June 30, 2015; and

Require all local law enforcement officers hired on or after June 30, 2015, to complete the training required by this subsection (4) within each officer's first year of employment.

In establishing the training program required by this subsection (4), a local law enforcement agency shall adopt or incorporate any minimum training curricula developed by the dog protection task force created in subsection (5) of this section.

The training program required by this subsection (4) must be wholly or principally provided or overseen by either a qualified animal behavior expert or licensed veterinarian. The qualified animal behavior expert or licensed veterinarian selected to provide the training must possess the minimum qualifications specified by the dog protection task force created in subsection (5) of this section.

Nothing in sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (II) requires live, in-person training be provided to local law enforcement agencies by qualified animal behavior experts or licensed veterinarians.

In order to reduce the costs of providing the training program required by this subsection (4), a local law enforcement agency may develop its own web- or video-based training or utilize such training developed by the dog protection task force under subparagraph (III) of paragraph (d) of subsection (5) of this section, and local law enforcement agencies are encouraged to seek qualified animal behavior experts or licensed veterinarians who will volunteer to provide or participate in the training.

A local law enforcement agency may collaborate with county sheriffs of Colorado, incorporated, the Colorado association of chiefs of police, the Colorado fraternal order of police, and the Colorado veterinary medical association, as well as nonprofit organizations engaged in animal welfare, to develop the training program required by this subsection (4).

The training program required by this subsection (4) must consist of a minimum of three hours of training for local law enforcement officers.

Nothing in this section prevents a local law enforcement agency from implementing a training program or adopting policies and procedures that exceed the minimum number of hours or other requirements set forth in this section and by the dog protection task force pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.

Task force.

There is hereby created the dog protection task force.

The task force consists of the following nineteen members:

Three licensed veterinarians appointed by the Colorado veterinary medical association or its successor entity;

Two representatives of the Colorado federation of animal welfare agencies or its successor entity;

One animal behaviorist or animal behavior expert appointed by the Colorado federation of dog clubs or its successor entity;

Two representatives of the Colorado association of animal control officers or its successor entity;

Three sheriffs or deputy sheriffs representing county sheriffs of Colorado, incorporated, or its successor entity, one of whom must have at least two years of experience working in a K-9 unit and one of whom must work in a county with a population of fewer than one hundred fifty thousand persons;

Three representatives of the Colorado association of chiefs of police or its successor entity, one of whom must have at least two years of experience working in a K-9 unit and one of whom must work in a municipality with a population of fewer than twenty-five thousand persons;

One representative of the Colorado fraternal order of police or its successor entity;

Three persons appointed by the Colorado bar association or its successor entity, two of whom must be attorneys with expertise and experience in animal law and dog shooting cases, and one of whom must be a person, who need not be an attorney, who owns or owned a dog shot by a local law enforcement officer; and

One member, appointed by the Colorado veterinary medical association, with expertise in canine behavior or other animal behavior. Licensed veterinarians and attorneys are ineligible for appointment under this sub-subparagraph (I).

The entities responsible for appointing task force members shall notify the Colorado veterinary medical association in writing of the identity of their appointees prior to the first meeting of the task force and upon any change in their appointees.

Members of the task force shall not be compensated for, or reimbursed for expenses incurred in, attending meetings of the task force.

The following two members are co-chairs of the task force:

One of the veterinarians appointed pursuant to sub-subparagraph (A) of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), which co-chair shall be named by the Colorado veterinary medical association; and

One of the members appointed pursuant to either sub-subparagraph (E) or (F) of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), as mutually agreed to by the appointing authorities.

The task force shall hold its first meeting no later than September 1, 2013.

The task force shall meet as often as necessary to complete the tasks described under paragraph (d) of this subsection (5) on or before July 1, 2014.

After July 1, 2014, and prior to January 31, 2015, the task force shall meet as often as it deems necessary, but no less frequently than once, to ensure that the curriculum, guidelines, and web- or video-based training are implemented and effective.

The task force shall hold its meetings and staff those meetings in a location offered for those purposes by one of the entities represented with task force membership, with preference accorded for the principal office of the Colorado veterinary medical association.

By July 1, 2014, the task force shall:

Develop minimum training curricula that a local law enforcement agency must use to fulfill the training requirement of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of this section;

Specify the appropriate minimum qualifications, including education, experience, or skills, that an animal behavior expert or licensed veterinarian providing the training pursuant to subparagraph (I) of paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of this section must possess; and

Develop, using volunteered and donated resources to the greatest extent possible, web- or video-based training that may be utilized by a local law enforcement agency to fulfill the training requirement of subsection (4) of this section.

The task force shall not recommend that the training required under this section be conducted by the peace officers standards and training board created in part 3 of article 31 of title 24, C.R.S.

The curricula, qualifications, and web- or video-based instruction described in paragraph (d) of this subsection (5) must be readily accessible by Colorado's local law enforcement agencies on one or more internet websites designated by the task force.

The task force created by paragraph (a) of this subsection (5) is dissolved, effective January 31, 2015.

Policies and procedures.

In addition to the training program developed under subsection (4) of this section, not later than September 1, 2014, each local law enforcement agency in the state shall adopt written policies and procedures that are specifically designed to address encounters with dogs occurring in the course of duty and the use of force against such dogs.

At a minimum, the policies and procedures must address the following:

The identification and meaning of common canine behaviors, and differentiating between dogs that are exhibiting behavior that puts local law enforcement officers or other persons in imminent danger and dogs who are not engaging in such behavior;

The alternatives to lethal use of force against dogs;

The reasonable opportunity for a dog owner to control or remove his or her dog from the immediate area. The policies and procedures adopted in accordance with this sub-subparagraph (C) must allow a local law enforcement officer to take into account the officer's own safety and the safety of other persons in the area, the availability of nonlethal equipment, the feasibility of so allowing a dog owner to act considering the totality of the circumstances, including the presence of an animal control officer or whether the call is a location that is listed in the dangerous dog registry created in section 35-42-115, C.R.S., or is a location at which illegal narcotics are suspected to be manufactured or trafficked, or any exigencies that may be present, such as when the local law enforcement officer is responding to a call that asserts or suggests that a person has been bitten by a dog or is in physical danger.

Each local law enforcement agency shall make the written policies and procedures available to the public for inspection in accordance with the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S.

Immunity. All task force members, as volunteers, are immune from civil actions and liabilities pursuant to section 13-21-115.5, C.R.S.

Scope and effect.

This section applies only to local law enforcement agencies and is not intended to affect, implicate, or abrogate the authority of the peace officers standards and training board created in part 3 of article 31 of title 24, C.R.S.

This section is not intended to apply to situations in which a dog is shot accidentally, including when a local law enforcement officer intends to fire at a person but inadvertently shoots a dog.

Nothing in this section affects or abrogates the ability of any duly authorized person to impound or euthanize a dog in accordance with section 18-9-202.5, C.R.S., or in accordance with any resolution adopted pursuant to section 30-15-101, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (SB 13-226), ch. 208, p. 858, § 2, effective May 13.

L. 2015:

IP(2), (4)(a)(II)(B), and (4)(a)(II)(C) amended and (2)(c) added, (SB 15-013), ch. 68, p. 185, § 2, effective April 3.

L. 2019:

(3)(c) amended, (HB19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1717, § 209, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

The dog protection task force referenced in subsection (2)(c) was dissolved, effective January 31, 2015.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration in the 2013 act adding this section, see section 1 of chapter 208, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 15-013, see section 1 of chapter 68, Session Laws of Colorado 2015.

29-5-113. Peace officers - post-traumatic stress disorder task force - creation - report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (HB 14-1343), ch. 371, p. 1764, § 1, effective June 6.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective December 31, 2015. (See L. 2014, p. 1764.)

29-5-114. Self-contained breathing apparatus - testing - certification - recertification.

A town, city, city and county, county, fire protection district, or state institution of higher education that owns or leases any self-contained breathing apparatus, as defined in section 24-33.5-2301, for use by police officers, deputy sheriffs, or firefighters shall ensure that the apparatus and all associated pressure vessels are regularly tested and certified in accordance with all applicable federal standards and with any standards for retesting and recertification that the director of the division of fire prevention and control in the department of public safety may promulgate by rule in accordance with section 24-33.5-2303.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-061), ch. 215, p. 2233, § 3, effective August 2.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 19-061, see section 1 of chapter 215, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.